Utah statutes.
53A-17a-131.16.   State contribution for school district hold harmless
program.
(1)  The state's contribution of $3,897,110 for a school district hold
harmless program for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2001, is appropriated
to the State Board of Education for distribution to school districts impacted
by the block grant programs established under Laws of Utah 2001, Chapter 335,
for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2001.
(2) (a)  The board shall allocate the appropriation to school districts and
the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind as provided for in rules of the
State Board of Education.
(b)  The rules shall provide for a reallocation of the total appropriation
based on final year end data.
(c)  Each school district shall receive its equitable share of the total which
may differ from the amount specified in Laws of Utah 2001, Chapter 335,
Section 22.
(d)  A district may not receive more or less than its equitable share of the
total.
